Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2507
Motor vehicle; exemption from certain laws; when.

A motor vehicle used in a ride-sharing arrangement that has a seating capacity for not more than fifteen persons, including the driver, shall not be a bus or commercial vehicle under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act or the Nebraska Rules of the Road.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 474;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 265.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.